Maryland, session 2026, HB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CHARITY CARE” MEANS FREE AND REDUCED–COST CARE
REQUIRED UNDER § 19–214.1 OF THIS TITLE.
[(2)] (3) “Commission” means the Health Services Cost Review
Commission.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1136*

HOUSE BILL 1136
[(3)] (4) (i) “Community benefit” means a planned, organized, and
measured activity that is intended to meet identified community health needs within a
service area.
(ii) “Community benefit” may include:
1. A community health service;
2. Health professional education;
3. Research;
4. A financial contribution;
5. A community–building activity, including partnerships
with community–based organizations;
6. Charity care;
7. An activity described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph that is funded by a foundation;
8. A mission–driven health service;
9. An operation related to an activity described under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph;
10. Financial or in–kind support of the Maryland Behavioral
Health Crisis Response System; [and]
11. A community health worker workforce program
established in accordance with § 19–303.1 of this subtitle; AND
12. GOVERNMENT–SPONSORED INDIGENT CARE.
[(4)] (5) “Community Benefit Reporting Workgroup” means the
Community Benefit Reporting Workgroup established in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section.
[(5)] (6) “Community health needs assessment” means the process
required by the Affordable Care Act by which unmet community health care needs and
priorities are identified by a nonprofit hospital in accordance with § 501(r)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code.

HOUSE BILL 1136 3
(7) “GOVERNMENT–SPONSORED INDIGENT CARE” MEANS THE
UNREIMBURSED COST TO A HOSPITAL OF PROVIDING HEALTH CARE SERVICES TO
RECIPIENTS OF A GOVERNMENT–BASED INDIGENT HEALTH CARE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL
LOCATED IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF FEWER THAN 50,000 PEOPLE.
(2) A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL ANNUALLY SHALL PROVIDE COMMUNITY
BENEFITS THAT:
(I) EQUAL AT LEAST 100% OF THE VALUE OF THE HOSPITAL’S
TAX–EXEMPT BENEFITS; OR
(II) EQUAL AT LEAST 5% OF THE VALUE OF THE HOSPITAL’S NET
PATIENT REVENUE, IF THE VALUE OF ALL CHARITY CARE PROVIDED EQUALS AT
LEAST 4% OF THE VALUE OF THE HOSPITAL’S NET PATIENT REVENUE.
(3) WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER THE END OF A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL’S
FISCAL YEAR, THE NONPROFIT HOSPITAL SHALL FILE A STATEMENT WITH THE
COMMISSION, DETAILING HOW THE NONPROFIT HOSPITAL HAS PROVIDED THE
COMMUNITY BENEFITS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028,
THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE
COMPTROLLER:
(I) A REPORT IDENTIFYING EACH NONPROFIT HOSPITAL, IF
ANY, THAT FAILED TO PROVIDE THE COMMUNITY BENEFITS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL
YEAR; AND
(II) FOR EACH NONPROFIT HOSPITAL IN THE STATE, A REPORT
ON:
1. THE AMOUNT OF COMMUNITY BENEFITS PROVIDED
BY THE HOSPITAL;
2. THE COST TO THE HOSPITAL OF EACH COMMUNITY
BENEFIT, INCLUDING AN ITEMIZED LIST OF THE COST TO THE HOSPITAL FOR
PROVIDING CHARITY CARE AND GOVERNMENT–SPONSORED INDIGENT CARE;
3. THE AMOUNT OF NET PATIENT REVENUE;

HOUSE BILL 1136
4. THE AMOUNT THAT WOULD EQUAL 4% OF NET
PATIENT REVENUE;
5. AN ITEMIZED CALCULATION DEMONSTRATING
WHETHER THE COMMUNITY BENEFITS PROVIDED BY THE HOSPITAL MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
6. THE VALUE OF THE TAX EXEMPTIONS THE HOSPITAL
CLAIMED DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR; AND
7. THE AMOUNT OF CHARITY CARE EXPENSES
REPORTED IN THE HOSPITAL’S MOST RECENT AUDITED FINANCIAL STATEMENT.
(5) (I) ON RECEIPT OF THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (4)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL VERIFY THAT
EACH NONPROFIT HOSPITAL IDENTIFIED IN THE REPORT HAS FAILED TO COMPLY
WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) IF THE COMPTROLLER FINDS THAT A NONPROFIT
HOSPITAL HAS NOT COMPLIED WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL REVOKE THE TAX–EXEMPT STATUS OF THE HOSPITAL FOR
THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING TAXABLE YEAR.
(III) A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL MAY CURE A FINDING OF
NONCOMPLIANCE BY THE COMPTROLLER BY PROVING THAT THE NONCOMPLIANCE
WAS A RESULT OF UNINTENTIONAL MISCALCULATION AND PROVIDING THE
REMAINING REQUIRED COMMUNITY BENEFITS.
(IV) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REINSTATE THE TAX–EXEMPT
STATUS OF A HOSPITAL THAT CURES A FINDING OF NONCOMPLIANCE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(V) A HOSPITAL MAY CURE A FINDING OF NONCOMPLIANCE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY ONCE.
[(b)] (C) (1) The Commission shall establish a Community Benefit Reporting
Workgroup.
(2) The Community Benefit Reporting Workgroup shall be composed of
individuals and stakeholder groups that have knowledge of and are impacted by hospital
community benefit spending.

HOUSE BILL 1136 5
[(c)] (D) The Commission shall adopt regulations to implement the
recommendations of the Community Benefit Reporting Workgroup, that:
(1) Establish a standard format for reporting the information required
under this subsection;
(2) Specify the date by which each nonprofit hospital is required to submit
the annual community benefit report;
(3) Require each nonprofit hospital to solicit and take into account input
received from individuals who represent the broad interests of that community, including
individuals with special knowledge of or expertise in public and behavioral health in
accordance with § 501(r)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(4) Require each nonprofit hospital to conduct its community health needs
assessment in consultation with community members as recommended by the Community
Benefit Reporting Workgroup and to submit an annual community benefits report to the
Commission detailing the community benefits provided by the hospital during the
preceding year that includes:
(i) The mission statement of the hospital;
(ii) A list of the activities that were undertaken by the hospital to
address the identified community health needs within the hospital’s community;
(iii) The cost to the hospital of each community benefit activity,
INCLUDING AN ITEMIZED REPORT OF THE COST TO THE HOSPITAL FOR PROVIDING
CHARITY CARE AND GOVERNMENT–SPONSORED INDIGENT CARE;
(iv) A description of how each of the listed activities addresses the
community health needs of the hospital’s community;
(v) A description of efforts taken to evaluate the effectiveness of each
community benefit activity;
(vi) A description of gaps in the availability of providers to serve the
community;
(vii) A description of the hospital’s efforts to track and reduce health
disparities in the community that the hospital serves;
(viii) A list of the unmet community health needs identified in the
most recent community health needs assessment; [and]
(ix) A list of tax exemptions the hospital claimed during the
immediately preceding taxable year, in accordance with State law; AND

HOUSE BILL 1136
(X) THE TOTAL OPERATING EXPENSES OF THE HOSPITAL FOR
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, COMPUTED USING GENERALLY
ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES FOR HOSPITALS.
[(d)] (E) The Commission shall establish a method through which State and
local governing bodies are made aware of the meetings of the Community Benefit Reporting
Workgroup.
(F) IF THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL HAS FAILED
TO SUBMIT THE ANNUAL COMMUNITY BENEFITS REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE THE NONPROFIT HOSPITAL WITH WRITTEN NOTICE
THAT THE HOSPITAL HAS FAILED TO FILE THE REQUIRED REPORT; AND
(2) IF THE HOSPITAL HAS STILL FAILED TO SUBMIT THE REPORT
WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE NONPROFIT HOSPITAL HAS BEEN PROVIDED WITH
WRITTEN NOTICE:
(I) FOR A HOSPITAL WITH A BED COUNT OF 30 OR FEWER,
IMPOSE A CIVIL MONETARY PENALTY OF $600 FOR EACH DAY THE HOSPITAL FAILS
TO SUBMIT THE REPORT;
(II) FOR A HOSPITAL WITH A BED COUNT OF AT LEAST 31 BUT
NOT MORE THAN 549, IMPOSE A CIVIL MONETARY PENALTY OF $20 PER BED FOR
EACH DAY THE HOSPITAL FAILS TO SUBMIT THE REPORT; OR
(III) FOR A HOSPITAL WITH A BED COUNT OF 550 OR MORE,
IMPOSE A CIVIL MONETARY PENALTY OF $11,000 FOR EACH DAY THE HOSPITAL
FAILS TO SUBMIT THE REPORT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.